Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 204. Preparation of Livestock and Poultry Products

§ 3301.
Legislative findings.

Meat, meat food products, poultry, and poultry products are an important source of the State’s total supply of food.
They are consumed throughout the State.
It is essential to the public interest that the health and welfare of consumers be protected by assuring that these commodities are wholesome, unadulterated, and properly marked, labeled, and packaged. Unwholesome, adulterated, or misbranded meat, meat food products, and poultry products impair the effective regulation of intrastate commerce, are injurious to the public welfare, destroy markets for wholesome, not adulterated and properly labeled and packaged meat, meat food product, and poultry product, as well as cause injury to consumers.
The unwholesome, adulterated, mislabeled, or deceptively packaged articles can be sold at lower prices and compete unfairly with the wholesome, unadulterated, correctly labeled, or nondeceptively packaged articles, to the detriment of consumers and the public generally.
It is hereby found that the regulation, enforcement, licensing, and other provisions contained within this chapter are necessary to protect the health and welfare of consumers.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986.

§ 3302.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, except as otherwise specified, the following terms shall have the meanings stated below:

“Adulterated” shall apply to any livestock product or poultry product under one or more of the following circumstances:

If it contains any poisonous or harmful substance which may render it injurious to health. The product shall not be considered adulterated under this definition if the quantity of the substance in or on the product does not ordinarily render it injurious to health.

If it contains any added poisonous or harmful substance which may, in the judgment of the Secretary, make the product unfit for human food.

If it is a raw agricultural commodity and the commodity contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of

21 U.S.C. § 346a

(tolerances for pesticide residues).

If it contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. § 348 (unsafe food additives).

If it contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of

21 U.S.C. § 379e

(listing of color additives). A product which is not otherwise deemed adulterated under subdivisions (C) and (D) of this subdivision (1) shall be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive, or color additive in or on the product is prohibited by rules of the Secretary in official or licensed establishments.

If it consists of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or is unsound, unhealthful, unwholesome, or otherwise unfit for human food.

If it has been prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions where it may have become contaminated with filth, or where it may have been rendered injurious to health.

If it is the product of an animal, including poultry, which has died in a manner other than by slaughter.

If its container is composed of any poisonous or harmful substance which may render the contents injurious to health.

If it has been subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to 21 U.S.C. § 348.

If any valuable constituent has been omitted or abstracted; or if any substance has been substituted, wholly or in part; or if damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner; or if any substance has been added or mixed or packed so as to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or of greater value than it is.

If it is margarine containing animal fat and any of the raw material used consisted of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

“Animal food manufacturer” means any person engaged in the business of preparing animal, including poultry, food derived wholly or in part from livestock or poultry carcasses or parts or products of carcasses.

“Broker” or “meat and poultry products broker” means any person engaged in the business of buying or selling livestock products or poultry products for other persons on commission, or otherwise negotiating purchases or sales of these products other than for his or her own account or as an employee of another person.

“Capable of use as human food” shall apply to any livestock or poultry carcass, or part or product of any livestock or poultry carcass, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by rules prescribed by the Secretary to deter its use as human food, or which is naturally inedible by humans.

“Commercial processor” means any person who maintains an establishment under this chapter for the purpose of processing livestock, meat, meat food product, poultry, or poultry product other than for the exclusive use in the household of the owner of the commodity, by him or her and members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees.

“Commercial slaughterhouse” means any person engaged in the business of slaughtering livestock or poultry other than as a custom slaughterer or a person conducting slaughter under subsections 3312(b), (c), and (d) of this title.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee.

“Container” or “package” means any box, can, tin, cloth, plastic, or other receptacle, wrapper, or cover.

“Custom processor” means any person who maintains an establishment under this chapter for the purpose of processing livestock, meat, meat food product, poultry, or poultry product exclusively for use, in the household of the owner of the commodity, by him or her and members of his or her household, and his or her nonpaying guests and employees.

“Custom slaughterhouse” means a person who maintains a slaughtering establishment under this chapter for the purposes of slaughtering livestock or poultry for another person’s exclusive use by him or her and members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees.

“Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act” means the Act so entitled, approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1040), and amendatory or supplementary acts codified at 21 U.S.C. §§ 301-399f. It shall include as part of its meaning the Vermont Food, Drug, Cosmetic and Hazardous Substance Labeling Act codified at 18 V.S.A. chapter 82, subchapter 1, rules adopted under that chapter, and amendatory or supplementary acts, where not inconsistent with the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” means the Act so entitled approved March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260), as amended by the Wholesome Meat Act (81 Stat. 584); the term “Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” means the Act so entitled approved August 28, 1957 (71 Stat. 441), as amended by the Wholesome Poultry Products Act (82 Stat. 791); and the term “Federal Acts” mean these two federal laws.

“Handler of dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals” means any person who buys, sells, transports, or otherwise handles any animal which died other than by slaughter, or any animal which displays symptoms of having any of the following:

central nervous system disorder;

abnormal temperature, high or low;

difficult breathing;

abnormal swellings;

lack of muscular coordination;

inability to walk normally or stand; or

any of the conditions for which livestock is required to be condemned on antemortem inspection in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

“Head of service” means the person designated by the Secretary to be in charge of the day-to-day operations of the Vermont Meat and Poultry Inspection and Licensing Program established by this chapter.

“Immediate container” means any consumer package, or any other container in which livestock products or poultry products, not consumer packaged, are packed.

“Inspector” means an employee or official of the State of Vermont authorized by the Secretary or any employee or official of the federal government or of any other governmental entity of this State, authorized by the Secretary to perform any inspection functions under this chapter under an agreement between the Secretary and the governmental entity.

“Intrastate commerce” means any commerce within this State.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon any product or the immediate container, not including package liners, of any product.

“Labeling” means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter:

upon any product or any of its containers or wrappers; or

accompanying the product.

“Licensed establishment” means any person required to hold a license under section 3306 of this title.

“Livestock” means any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, whether live or dead.

“Livestock product” means any carcass, or part of a carcass, meat, or meat food product of any livestock.

“Meat” means the part of the muscle of any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equines which is skeletal or which is found in the tongue, in the diaphragm, in the heart, or in the esophagus, with or without the accompanying and overlying fat, and the portions of bone, skin, sinew, nerve, blood vessels that normally accompany the muscle tissue and that does not include the muscle found in the lips, snout, or ears.

“Meat food product” and “meat product” mean any product capable of use as human food that is made wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any cattle, sheep, swine, or goats, excepting products that are exempted from definition as a meat food product by the Secretary under conditions that he or she may prescribe to assure that the meat or other portions of carcass contained in products are unadulterated and that products are not represented as meat food products. This term as applied to food products of equines shall have a meaning comparable to that provided in this subdivision with respect to cattle, sheep, swine, and goats.

“Misbranded” shall apply to any livestock product or poultry product under one or more of the following circumstances:

if its labeling is false or misleading in any way;

if it is offered for sale under the name of another food;

if it is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated;

if its container is made, formed, or filled as to be misleading;

unless it bears a label showing:

the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and

an accurate statement of the quantity of the product in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that under this subdivision (E), exemptions as to livestock products not in containers may be established by rules prescribed by the Secretary and provided, further, that under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (E), reasonable variations may be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages may be established for livestock products or poultry products by rule prescribed by the Secretary;

if any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or other labeling is not prominently placed with such conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling and in terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

if it is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity or composition has been prescribed by the rules of the Secretary under section 3305 of this title unless:

it conforms to the definition and standard; and

its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard and, insofar as may be required by rules, the common names of optional ingredients other than spices, flavoring, and coloring present in the food;

if it is represented as a food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by rules of the Secretary under section 3305 of this title and it falls below the standard of fill of container, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as the rules specify, a statement that it falls below the standard;

if it is not subject to the provisions of subdivision (G) of this subdivision (25), unless its label bears:

the common or usual name of the food, if any; and

in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common name of each ingredient, except that spices, flavorings, and colorings may, when authorized by the Secretary, be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each; provided, that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (I) is impracticable, or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by rules adopted by the Secretary;

if it is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the Secretary determines to be, and by rules prescribe as, necessary in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for these uses;

if it contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it has a label stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this subdivision (K) is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by rules adopted by the Secretary;

if it fails to have, directly on its containers, as the Secretary may by rules prescribe, the official inspection legend and establishment number of the establishment where the product was prepared, and, unrestricted by any of the foregoing, such other information as the Secretary may require in rules to assure that it will not have false or misleading labeling and that the public will be informed of the manner of handling required to maintain the product in a wholesome condition.

“Official certificate” means any certificate prescribed by rules of the Secretary for issuance by an inspector or other person performing official functions under this chapter.

“Official device” means any device prescribed or authorized by the Secretary for use in applying any official mark.

“Official establishment” means any establishment as determined by the Secretary at which inspection of the slaughter of livestock or poultry or the preparation of livestock products or poultry products is maintained under the authority of this chapter.

“Official inspection legend” means any symbol prescribed by rules of the Secretary showing that a product was inspected and passed in accordance with this chapter.

“Official mark” means the official inspection legend or any other symbol prescribed by rules of the Secretary to identify the status of any product of livestock or poultry under this chapter.

“Person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other business unit, and any officer, agent or employee.

“Pesticide chemical,” “food additive,” “color additive,” and “raw agricultural commodity” shall have the same meanings for purposes of this chapter as under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

“Poultry” means any domesticated bird, whether live or dead.

“Poultry product” means any poultry carcass or part of a carcass; or any product which is made wholly or in part from any poultry carcass or part of a carcass, excepting products which are exempted by the Secretary from definition as a poultry product under conditions which he or she may prescribe to assure that the poultry ingredients in products are not adulterated, and that these products are not represented as poultry products.

“Prepared” means slaughtered, canned, salted, stuffed, rendered, boned, cut up, or otherwise manufactured or processed.

“Public warehouseman” means any person who acts as a temporary custodian of meat, meat food product, or poultry product stored in that person’s warehouse for a fee.

“Reinspection” includes inspection of the preparation of livestock products and poultry products, as well as reexamination of products previously inspected.

“Renderer” means any person engaged in the business of rendering livestock or poultry carcasses, or parts of products of carcasses, except rendering conducted under inspection or exemption under this chapter.

“Retail vendor” means any person who sells, displays, advertises for sale, offers for sale, or has available for sale meat, meat food products, or poultry products for purchase by consumers. Retail vendors include persons who operate stores, sell or attempt to sell to consumers at their homes, or otherwise sell, display, advertise, offer, or have available for sale, meat food products or poultry products at retail for purchase by consumers.

“Shipping container” means any container used or intended for use in packaging the product packed in an immediate container.

“Wholesale distributor” means any person who sells meat to retail vendors, other merchants, or to industrial, institutional, and commercial users mainly for resale or business use.

“Mobile slaughter and processing establishment” means any transportable structure used for slaughtering or processing of meat or poultry products on a farm or on an agricultural fairground registered pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 3902

.

“Itinerant livestock slaughter” means slaughter, in accordance with the requirements of subsection 3311a(e) of this title, of livestock owned by a person for his or her exclusive use or for use by members of his or her household and his or her nonpaying guests and employees.

“Itinerant poultry slaughter” means the slaughter of poultry:

at a person’s home or farm in accordance with subsection 3312(b) of this title; or

at a facility approved by the Secretary for the slaughtering of poultry.

“Itinerant slaughterer” means a person who, for compensation or gain, engages in itinerant livestock slaughter or itinerant poultry slaughter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1991, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2005, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 38

, § 10, eff. May 21, 2007;

2011, No. 13

, § 1, eff. April 28, 2011;

2013, No. 83

, § 1, eff. June 10, 2013;

2017, No. 52

, § 3, eff. May 30, 2017;

2017, No. 74

, § 12;

2019, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 3303.
Purposes.

It is the objective of this chapter to provide for meat and poultry products inspection programs that will impose and enforce requirements with respect to intrastate operations and commerce that are at least equal to those imposed and enforced under the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act with respect to operations and transactions in interstate commerce.
In addition, it is the further objective of this chapter to provide for licensing, and periodic review of establishments, such as retail vendors, custom licensed establishments, and wholesale distributors, which are not subject to traditional inspection under the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.
In this way the public will be better protected from uninspected, adulterated, unwholesome, mislabeled, or otherwise illegal meat and poultry products. The Secretary is directed to administer this chapter so as to accomplish these purposes.
The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets is designated as the appropriate State agency to cooperate with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States and to administer this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3304.
Powers of the Secretary.

In order to accomplish the objectives stated in section 3303 of this title, the Secretary shall:

by rules require ante mortem and post mortem inspections, quarantine, segregation, and reinspections with respect to the slaughter of livestock and poultry and the preparation of livestock products and poultry products at all establishments in this state, except those exempted by him or her under subdivision (13) of section 3305 of this title, at which livestock or poultry are slaughtered or livestock products or poultry products are prepared for human food solely for distribution in intrastate commerce;

by rules require the identification of livestock and poultry for inspection purposes and the marking and labeling of livestock products or poultry products or their containers, or both, as “Vermont Inspected and Passed” if the products are not found upon inspection to be adulterated and “Vermont Inspected and Condemned” if they are found upon inspection to be adulterated, and the destruction for food purposes of all the condemned products under the supervision of an inspector;

prohibit the entry into official establishments of livestock products and poultry products not prepared under federal inspection or inspection pursuant to this chapter and further limit the entry of these articles and other materials into establishments under conditions which he or she deems necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

by rules require that when livestock products and poultry products leave official establishments they shall bear directly on the products or on their containers, or both, as he or she may require, all information required under subdivision 3302(25) of this title; and require approval of all labeling and containers to be used for the products when sold or transported in intrastate commerce to assure that they comply with the requirements of this chapter;

investigate the sanitary conditions of each establishment within subdivision (1) of this section and withdraw or otherwise refuse to provide inspection service at any establishment where the sanitary conditions are such as to render adulterated any livestock products or poultry products prepared or handled there;

adopt rules relating to sanitation for all establishments required to have inspection under subdivision (1) of this section, or required to be licensed under section 3306 of this title;

by rules require that the following classes of persons shall keep records and for periods as are specified in the rules to fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in their business, and afford to the Commissioner and his or her representatives, including representatives of other governmental agencies designated by him or her, access to places of business, and opportunity, at all reasonable times, to examine the facilities, inventory, and records, to copy the records, and to take reasonable samples of the inventory upon the payment of the fair market value, any persons that engage in or for intrastate commerce:

in the business of slaughtering any livestock or poultry, or preparing, freezing, packaging or labeling, buying or selling as brokers, wholesalers, or otherwise, transporting, or storing any livestock products for human or animal food;

in business as renderers or in the business of buying, selling, or transporting any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, or parts of the carcasses of any of these animals including poultry, that died otherwise than by slaughter; or

who are required to be licensed under section 3306 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 3305.
Additional powers of the Secretary.

In order to accomplish the objectives stated in section 3303 of this title, the Secretary may:

Remove inspectors from any establishment that fails to destroy condemned products as required under subdivision 3304(2) of this title.

Refuse to provide inspection service under this chapter with respect to any establishment for reasons specified in section 401 of the Federal Meat Inspection Act or section 18 of the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act or for any other violation of this chapter and the regulations promulgated under it.

Order labeling and containers to be withheld from use if he or she determines that the labeling is false or misleading or the containers are of a misleading size or form.

By rules, prescribe the sizes, style, and type to be used for labeling information required under this chapter, and definitions and standards of identity or composition or standards of fill of container, consistent with federal standards, when he or she deems the action appropriate for the protection of the public.

By rules, prescribe conditions for storage and handling of livestock products and poultry products by persons engaged in the business of buying, selling, freezing, storing, or transporting these products in or for intrastate commerce to assure that these products will not be adulterated or misbranded when delivered to the consumer.

Require that equines be slaughtered and prepared in establishments separate from establishments where other livestock are slaughtered or their products are prepared.

Authorize inspection to continue at official establishments on State holidays, or beyond the regular work shift or workweek for State inspectors; provided that the necessary inspectors are available and the official establishment pays all overtime salaries of inspections necessary to keep the plant open and other expenses occasioned by the overtime employment. All of these payments shall be retained in a revolving fund for administrating this chapter.

Adopt rules as necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this chapter, including rules of practice providing opportunity for hearing in connection with issuance of orders under subdivision 3304(5) or subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section and establishing a procedure for proceedings in these cases. This shall not preclude a requirement that a label or container be withheld from use, or a refusal of inspection under subdivision 3304(5) or subdivision (1) or (3) of this section pending issuance of a final order in any proceeding. The federal meat inspection regulations and federal poultry inspection regulations of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, Title 9, Code of Federal Regulations, Chapter 3, 9 CFR §§ 300.1 et seq., together with any amendments, supplements, or revisions thereto, are adopted as part of this chapter.

Appoint and prescribe the duties for a head of service and such inspectors and other personnel as he or she deems necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this chapter.

Cooperate with the U.S. Secretary of Agriculture in administration of this chapter to accomplish the purposes stated in section 3303; accept federal assistance for that purpose and spend public funds of this State appropriated for administration of this chapter to pay the State’s proportionate share of the estimated total cost of the cooperative program.

Recommend to the U.S. Secretary of Agriculture, officials or employees of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for appointment to the advisory committees provided for in the federal acts.

Serve as the representative of the Governor for consultation with the Secretary under subsection (c) of section 301 of the Federal Meat Inspection Act and subsection (c) of section 5 of the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act unless the Governor selects another representative.

Exempt the operations of any person from inspection or other requirements of this chapter if and to the extent the operations would be exempt from the corresponding requirements under the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act if they were conducted in or for interstate commerce or if the State were designated under the federal acts as one in which the federal requirements apply to intrastate commerce.

Require retail vendors who affix labels with a date to meat, meat food products, or poultry products to clearly and conspicuously post their policy concerning date of sale labeling in order to enable consumers to understand the policy.

Establish by rule the method for providing voluntary inspection, and withdrawal of inspection, of exotic animals, wild game, game birds, red deer, and cervidae. These rules may also provide for the inspection of meat and meat food products derived from those animals. The Secretary shall provide voluntary inspection of bison and cervidae produced in Vermont, including the inspection of meat and meat food products processed in Vermont derived from bison and cervidae, wherever produced. For such inspection, the Secretary shall charge a fee equal to the rate for reimbursable inspection services provided under the Vermont Meat and Poultry Inspection Program.

Exempt livestock producers who sell directly to consumers or inspected slaughterhouses in carcass form from the licensing requirements of section 3306 of this title. To be eligible for this exemption, the livestock shall be slaughtered under inspection and the producer shall relinquish control of the carcass at the slaughterhouse. Payment for the carcasses shall be based on hanging weight rather than live weight. This exemption does not apply to any retail operations or poultry.

Authorize and recognize mobile slaughter and processing establishments as official establishments or exempt them under subdivision 3305(13) of this section.

Sell or lease a mobile slaughtering unit, and may retain any proceeds therefrom in a fund designated for the purpose of purchasing additional mobile slaughtering units or providing matching grants for capital investments to increase poultry slaughter or poultry processing capacity.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1991, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1993, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1997, No. 35

, § 1, eff. May 22, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 124;

2003, No. 37

, § 6;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2007, No. 38

, § 11, eff. May 21, 2007;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. June 3, 2010;

2011, No. 13

, § 2, eff. April 28, 2011;

2013, No. 83

, § 2, eff. June 10, 2013;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 3306.
Licensing.

No person shall engage in intrastate commerce in the business of buying, selling, preparing, processing, packing, storing, transporting, or otherwise handling meat, meat food products, or poultry products, unless that person holds a valid license issued under this chapter. Categories of licensure shall include: commercial slaughterers, custom slaughterers, commercial processors, custom processors, wholesale distributors, retail vendors, meat and poultry product brokers, renderers, public warehouse operators, animal food manufacturers, handlers of dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, and any other category which the Secretary may by rule establish.

The owner or operator of each plant or establishment of the kind specified in subsection (a) of this section shall apply in writing to the Secretary on a form prescribed by him or her for a license to operate the plant or establishment. In case of change of ownership or change of location, a new application shall be made. Any person engaged in more than one licensed activity shall obtain separate licenses for each activity.

The head of service shall investigate all circumstances in connection with the application for license to determine whether the applicable requirements of this chapter and rules made under it have been complied with. The Secretary shall grant, condition, or refuse the license upon the basis of all information available to him or her including all facts disclosed by investigation. Each license shall bear an identifying number.

The annual fee for a license for a retail vendor is $15.00 for vendors without meat cutting operations, $50.00 for vendors with meat cutting space of less than 300 square feet or meat display space of less than 20 linear feet, and $100.00 for vendors with 300 or more square feet of meat cutting space and 20 or more linear feet of meat display space. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in a special fund managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, and shall be available to the Agency to offset the cost of administering chapter 204 of this title. For all other plants, establishments, and related businesses listed under subsection (a) of this section, except for a public warehouse licensed under chapter 67 of this title, the annual license fee shall be $150.00.

The Secretary may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, refuse to grant, suspend, or revoke a license, may impose terms or conditions for operation under a license, including video monitoring, or may take any other action which he or she deems appropriate concerning any license, if he or she determines that any false statement was made in the application or if he or she finds that there is any failure to comply with this chapter or the rules made under it.

[Repealed.]

Producers of livestock and livestock dealers who sell carcasses to or through inspected slaughterhouses are exempt from having to obtain a wholesale distributor’s license under this section. All other licensing provisions shall be applicable to such an individual.

The Secretary may deny a commercial slaughter license or the renewal of a commercial slaughter license under this chapter to a person who has been convicted of a felony, convicted of a misdemeanor involving cruelty to animals, or has been found in violation of section 3132 of this title more than once. The Secretary may deny a commercial slaughter license or renewal of a commercial slaughter license under this chapter if a person responsibly connected to the applicant has been convicted of a felony, convicted of a misdemeanor involving cruelty to animals, or has been found in violation of section 3132 of this title more than once. As used in this subsection, a “person responsibly connected to an applicant” is a partner, officer, director, holder, or owner of 10 percent or more of the voting stock of the applicant’s business or is an employee in a managerial or executive capacity at the applicant’s business.

All applicants for licensure or relicensure as a commercial slaughter facility shall submit a written humane livestock handling plan or a good commercial practices plan for poultry for review and approval by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee. The Secretary may suspend, revoke, or condition any commercial slaughter facility license, after notice and opportunity for hearing, for a licensee’s failure to adhere to the written plan.

Commercial slaughter facilities issued a license by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall submit to the Secretary or designee within five days of receipt any documentation received from the U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) related to violations of the Federal Humane Slaughter Act and rules adopted thereunder. The Secretary shall review the documentation submitted under this subdivision for potential action under this chapter or chapter 201 of this title. A failure to submit documentation required under this subdivision shall be a violation of this chapter subject to an administrative penalty under chapter 15 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

1989, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

1991, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 40, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2007, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 15, 2009;

2009, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2009, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. June 3, 2010;

2013, No. 83

, § 3, eff. June 10, 2013;

2015, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2017, No. 75

, § 5.

§ 3307.
Periodic review of noninspected licensed establishments.

The Secretary may cause establishments which are required to be licensed under section 3306 of this title, but exempt from inspection under subdivision 3305(13) of this title, to be periodically reviewed by inspectors to assure that the provisions of this chapter and the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter are complied with, and that the public health, safety, and welfare is protected.

Any periodic review shall include an examination of the licensed establishment’s sanitation practices; sanitation of the areas where meat and poultry products are prepared, stored, and displayed; the adequacy of any refrigeration system used for meat food products and poultry products; labeling; and meat food products, or poultry products for wholesomeness and adulteration. In addition, the inspector conducting the periodic review may conduct any other examination necessary to assure compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

The inspector may issue a stop sale or use order for any violation of this chapter, or of the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. Any person receiving a stop sale or use order shall immediately remove the meat, meat food product, or poultry product from sale, or shall immediately cease to use any equipment or area as directed by the order until the order is lifted. The inspector may lift a stop sale or use order once he or she has determined that the violation has been corrected. Any person receiving a stop sale or use order may appeal the decision to the Secretary within five days of receiving the order.

After discovery of a violation of this chapter, or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, the Secretary may take any additional action against the licensed establishment which he or she deems appropriate, including: instituting a proceeding under section 3306(e), and causing a civil, equitable, or criminal court proceeding to be brought against the licensed establishment.

The Secretary may adopt all rules necessary to implement and enforce the licensing and periodic review provisions of the chapter, which may include minimum standards for sanitation, refrigeration, labeling, wholesomeness, adulteration, and such other rules as the Secretary deems necessary.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 226

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 2, 1986; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.